Massachusetts, session 194th, S2510.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Every mayor, city councilor, and school committee member who is elected
to represent an individual ward, or at-large, as the case may be, shall have been an inhabitant of a
place within the ward, or for the positions of mayor or councilor-at-large shall have been an
inhabitant of a place within the city of Brockton, for which he is chosen for election for at least
one year immediately preceding his election, and shall cease to represent such ward or city for
the positions of mayor or councilor-at-large when he shall cease to be an inhabitant thereof.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1